Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3509
General powers of custodial trustee.

(a) A custodial trustee, acting in a fiduciary capacity, has all the rights and powers over custodial trust property which an unmarried adult owner has over individually owned property, but a custodial trustee may exercise those rights and powers in a fiduciary capacity only.

(b) This section does not relieve a custodial trustee from liability for a violation of section 30-3508.

Laws 1997, LB 51, § 9.